Idaho, session 2026, H0780.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-203, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-203. DUAL ENROLLMENT. (1) The parent or guardian of a child of
school age who is enrolled in a nonpublic school or a public charter school
shall be allowed to enroll the student in any public school, including an-
other public charter school, for dual enrollment purposes. The board of
trustees of the school district or board of directors of the public char-
ter school shall adopt procedures governing enrollment pursuant to this
section. If enrollment in a specific program reaches the maximum for the
program, priority for enrollment shall be given to a student who is enrolled
full time in the public school. In the case of dual enrollment in a public
charter school, the student who is dually enrolled shall not count toward
the public charter school's maximum enrollment restrictions. The dually
enrolled student's primary education provider shall be the provider in which
the student is registered for the majority of the coursework. At no time
may the dual enrollment provisions be used to circumvent a public charter
school's lottery requirements.
(2) Any student participating in dual enrollment may enter into any
program in the public school available to other students, subject to compli-
ance with the eligibility requirements herein and the same responsibilities
and standards of behavior and performance that apply to any student's
participation in the activity, except that the academic eligibility re-
quirements for participation in nonacademic activities are as provided for
herein.
(3) All schools shall be allowed to include dually enrolled nonpublic
school and public school students for the purposes of state funding only to
the extent of the student's participation in the public school academic pro-
grams.
(4) Oversight of academic standards relating to participation in
nonacademic public school activities shall be the responsibility of the pri-
mary education provider for that student. In order for any nonpublic school
student or public school student to participate in nonacademic public school
activities for which public school students must demonstrate academic pro-
ficiency or eligibility, the nonpublic school or public school student shall
demonstrate composite grade-level academic proficiency on any state board
of education recognized achievement test, portfolio, or other mechanism
as provided for in state board of education rules deemed appropriate by


the student's primary education provider. Additionally, a student shall
be eligible if he achieves a minimum composite, core or survey test score
within the average or higher-than-average range as established by the test
service utilized on any nationally normed test. Demonstrated proficiency
shall be used to determine eligibility for the current and next following
school years. School districts and public charter schools shall provide to
nonpublic students who wish to participate in dual enrollment activities
the opportunity to take state tests or other standardized tests given to all
regularly enrolled public school students.
(5) A public school student who has been unable to maintain academic el-
igibility is ineligible to participate in nonacademic public school activi-
ties as a nonpublic school or public charter school student for the duration
of the school year in which the student becomes academically ineligible and
for the following academic year.
(6) A nonpublic school or public school student participating in
nonacademic public school activities must reside within the attendance
boundaries of the school for which the student participates. Subject to all
other provisions of this section, all eligible nonpublic students shall be
able to access and participate in all nonacademic public school activities,
including both extracurricular and cocurricular activities.
(7) School districts and public charter schools may charge a fee for
nonpublic student participation in nonacademic public school activities.
Such fee shall reflect the costs associated with participation in the activ-
ity.
(7) (8) Dual enrollment shall include the option of joint enrollment in
a regular public school and an alternative public school program. The state
board of education shall establish rules that provide funding to school dis-
tricts for each student who participates in both a regular public school pro-
gram and an alternative public school program.
(8) (9) Dual enrollment shall include the option of enrollment in a
postsecondary institution. Any credits earned from an accredited postsec-
ondary institution shall be credited toward state board of education high
school graduation requirements.
(9) (10) A nonpublic student is any student who receives educational
instruction outside a public school classroom and such instruction can in-
clude, but is not limited to, a private school or a home school.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.